Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-209
Appeal from Secretary of State's refusal
to file document.

(MBCA
1.26) (a) If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered for
filing, the domestic or foreign corporation may appeal the refusal within
thirty days after the return of the document to the district court of Lancaster
County. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing
the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the Secretary
of State's explanation of his or her refusal to file.

(b) The court may summarily
order the Secretary of State to file the document or take other action the
court considers appropriate.

(c)
The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 9.